California statutes. Public Contract Code
 design professionals responsible for performing design services on behalf of a design-build entity that has been replaced pursuant to paragraph (1) shall have sole liability for their design errors and omissions, provided the local agency elects to use their complete and stamped designs with subsequent design-build entities or licensed contractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 109.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.6.

(a) The local agency, in each design-build request for qualifications, may identify specific types of subcontractors that shall be included in the design-build entity’s statement of qualifications. All construction subcontractors that are identified in the statement of qualifications shall be afforded the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(b) Following award of the design-build contract, except for those construction subcontractors listed in the statement of qualifications, the design-build entity shall proceed as listed in this subdivision in awarding construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the contract price allocable to construction work for projects with a contract
 value greater than or equal to ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(1) Provide public notice of availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the local agency, including a fixed date and time on which qualifications statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(2) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(3) Award the subcontract on a best value basis. The process may include prequalification or short-listing.

(c) Subcontractors awarded construction subcontracts under this subdivision shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(d) A
 construction subcontractor licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code that provides design services used on a project authorized by this chapter shall not be subject to any liability arising from their design if the construction subcontract for that design is not performed by that subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.7.

(a) If the local agency elects to award a project pursuant to this chapter, retention proceeds withheld by the local agency from the design-build entity shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation. Work performed to establish the guaranteed maximum price shall not be subject to retention.

(b) In a contract between the design-build entity and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the local agency and the design-build entity. If the design-build entity provides written notice to any
 subcontractor that is not a member of the design-build entity, before or at the time the bid is requested, that a bond may be required, and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the design-build entity, then the design-build entity may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the local agency and the design-build entity from any payment made by the design-build entity to the subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, no later than January 1, 2028, a local agency that uses the progressive design-build process pursuant to this chapter shall submit to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature a report on the use of the progressive design-build process.

(b) The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) A description of the project or projects awarded using the progressive design-build process.

(2) The contract award amounts.

(3) The design-build
 entities awarded the project or projects.

(4) A description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, or award of the contracts, including the resolution of the protests.

(5) A description of the prequalification process.

(6) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that provided design services, but did not meet the target price for their scope of work, and therefore did not perform construction services on that project.

(7) Whether or not any portion of a design prepared by the specialty subcontractor that did not perform the construction work for that design was used by the local agency.

(8) The number of
 specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that meet the definition of a small business, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(9) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that meet the definition of a microbusiness, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(10) If a project awarded under this chapter has been completed, an assessment of the project performance, including, but not limited to, a summary of any delays or cost increases.

(c) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.9.

The authorization to use the progressive design-build contracting process pursuant to this chapter does not include the authority to perform construction inspection services for projects on, or interfacing with, the state highway system. Construction inspection services for those projects shall be performed by the Department of Transportation pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 14000) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, consistent with Section 91.2 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.10.

Nothing in this chapter affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 22180.11)
-------------------------------------------

22180.11.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 310, Sec. 1.   (SB 617)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Ch. 4.6, commencing with Section 22180.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.7. Local Agency Design-Build Contracting [22185. - 22185.11.]

22185.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) (1) “Best value” means a value determined by evaluation of objective criteria that may include, but are not limited to, price, features, function, life-cycle costs, experience, and past performance.

(2) A best value determination may involve the selection of the lowest cost proposal meeting the interests of the local agency and the objectives of the project.

(b) “Construction subcontract” means each subcontract awarded by the design-build entity to a subcontractor that will perform work or labor or render service to the design-build entity in or
 about the construction of the work or improvement, or a subcontractor licensed by the State of California that, under subcontract to the design-build entity, specially fabricates and installs a portion of the work or improvement according to detailed drawings contained in the plans and specifications produced by the design-build team.

(c) “Design-build entity” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, and engineering services as needed pursuant to a design-build contract.

(d) “Design-build project” means any project using the progressive design-build construction procurement process described in this chapter, but does not include projects on state-owned or state-operated facilities.

(e) “Design-build team” means the design-build entity itself and the individuals and other entities identified by the design-build entity as members of its team. Members shall include the general contractor and, if utilized in the design of the project, all electrical, mechanical, and plumbing contractors.

(f) “Guaranteed maximum price” means the maximum payment amount agreed upon by the local agency and the design-build entity for the design-build entity to finish all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project.

(g) “Local agency” means a city, county, city and county, or special district.

(h) “Progressive design-build” means a project delivery process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured from a single
 entity that is selected through a qualifications-based selection at the earliest feasible stage of the project.

(i) “Qualifications-based selection” means the process by which the local agency solicits for services from the design-build entities and that price is not the sole factor as the basis of award.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.1.

A local agency may procure progressive design-build contracts and use the progressive design-build contracting process described in this chapter for up to 10 public works projects in excess of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for each project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.2.

A local agency entering into design-build contracts authorized under this chapter shall develop guidelines for a standard organizational conflict-of-interest policy, consistent with applicable law, regarding the ability of a person or entity that performs services for the local agency relating to the solicitation of a design-build project, to submit a proposal as a design-build entity, or to join a design-build team.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.3.

The procurement process for progressive design-build projects shall progress as follows:

(a) The local agency shall prepare and issue a request for qualifications in order to select a design-build entity to execute the project. The request for qualifications shall include, but is not limited to, the following elements:

(1) Documentation of the size, type, and desired design character of the project and any other information deemed necessary to describe adequately the local agency’s needs, including the expected cost range, the methodology that will be used by the local agency to evaluate the design-build entity’s qualifications, the procedure for final selection of the design-build entity, and
 any other information deemed necessary by the local agency to inform interested parties of the contracting opportunity.

(2) Significant factors that the local agency reasonably expects to consider in evaluating qualifications, including technical design and construction expertise, and all other non-price-related factors. The local agency may require that a preliminary cost estimate be included in the design-build entities’ responses and consider those costs in evaluating the statements of qualifications.

(3) The relative importance or the weight assigned to each of the factors identified in the request for qualifications.

(4) A standard template request for statements of qualifications prepared by the local agency. In preparing the standard template, the local agency may consult with the construction industry, the
 building trades and surety industry, and other local agencies interested in using the authorization provided by this chapter. The template shall require the following information:

(A) If the design-build entity is a privately held corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or joint venture, a listing of all of the entity’s shareholders, partners, or members known at the time of the statement of qualification submission who will perform work on the project.

(B) Evidence that the members of the design-build team have completed, or have demonstrated the experience, competency, capability, and capacity to complete, projects of similar size, scope, or complexity, and that proposed key personnel have sufficient experience and training to competently manage and complete the design and construction of the project, and a financial statement that ensures that the design-build
 entity has the capacity to complete the project.

(C) The licenses, registration, and credentials required to design and construct the project, including, but not limited to, information on the revocation or suspension of any license, credential, or registration.

(D) Evidence that establishes that the design-build entity has the capacity to obtain all required payment and performance bonding, liability insurance, and errors and omissions insurance.

(E) Information concerning workers’ compensation experience history and a worker safety program.

(F) If the proposed design-build entity is a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, or other legal entity, a copy of the organizational documents or agreement committing to form the
 organization.

(G) An acceptable safety record. A proposer’s safety record shall be deemed acceptable if its experience modification rate for the most recent three-year period is an average of 1.00 or less, and its average total recordable injury or illness rate and average lost work rate for the most recent three-year period does not exceed the applicable statistical standards for its business category or if the proposer is a party to an alternative dispute resolution system as provided for in Section 3201.5 of the Labor Code.

(5) The information required under this subdivision shall be certified under penalty of perjury by the design-build entity and its general partners or joint venture members.

(b) (1) A design-build entity shall not be evaluated for selection unless the entity provides an
 enforceable commitment to the local agency that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades, in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply if one or more of the following requirements are met:

(A) The local agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(B) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into
 by the local agency before January 1, 2023.

(C) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(c) At the close of the solicitation period, the local agency shall review the submissions. The local agency may evaluate submissions based solely upon the information provided in each design-build entity’s statement of qualifications. The local agency may also interview some or all of the design-build entities to further evaluate their qualifications for the project.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, upon issuance of a contract award, the local agency shall publicly announce its award, identifying the design-build entity to which the award is made, along with a statement regarding the basis of the award. The statement regarding the local agency’s contract award and the contract file shall provide sufficient information to satisfy an external audit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.4.

(a) The design-build entity shall provide payment and performance bonds for the project in the form and in the amount required by the local agency, and issued by a California admitted surety. The amount of the payment bond shall not be less than the amount of the performance bond.

(b) The design-build contract shall require errors and omissions insurance coverage for the design elements of the project.

(c) The local agency shall develop a standard form of payment and performance bond for its design-build projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.5.

(a) After selecting a design-build entity based upon qualifications, the local agency may enter into a contract and direct the design-build entity to begin design and preconstruction activities sufficient to establish a guaranteed maximum price for the project.

(b) (1) Upon agreement of the guaranteed maximum price for the project, the local agency, at its sole and absolute discretion, may amend its contract with the design-build entity to contract for the remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project, consistent with the guaranteed maximum price. In the event that there are unforeseen site
 conditions, the local agency may amend its contract with the design-build entity accordingly and consistent with the guaranteed maximum price, to enable the entity to complete the remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project.

(2) If the cost for completing all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project exceeds the guaranteed maximum price, the costs exceeding the guaranteed maximum price shall be the responsibility of the design-build entity. If the cost for these activities are less than the guaranteed maximum price, the design-build entity shall not be entitled to the difference between the cost and the guaranteed maximum price unless there is a prior written agreement concerning the sharing
 of these funds. For purposes of this section, cost shall include the design-build entity’s direct costs, general conditions, overhead, and fee.

(c) (1) If the local agency and the design-build entity do not reach agreement on a guaranteed maximum price, or the local agency otherwise elects not to amend the design-build entity’s contract to complete the remaining work, the local agency may solicit proposals to complete the project from firms that submitted statements of qualifications pursuant to Section 22185.3. The local
 agency may also, upon written determination that it is in the best interest of the city, county, city and county, or special district, as applicable, to do so, formally solicit proposals from other design-build entities, and contract award shall be made on a best value basis.

(2) The design professionals responsible for performing design services on behalf of a design-build entity that has been replaced pursuant to paragraph (1) shall have sole liability for their design errors and omissions, provided the local agency elects to use their complete and stamped designs with subsequent design-build entities or licensed contractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 110.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.6.

(a) The local agency, in each design-build request for qualifications, may identify specific types of subcontractors that shall be included in the design-build entity’s statement of qualifications. All construction subcontractors that are identified in the statement of qualifications shall be afforded the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(b) Following award of the design-build contract, except for those construction subcontractors listed in the statement of qualifications, the design-build entity shall proceed as listed in this subdivision in awarding construction subcontracts with a value exceeding one-half of 1 percent of the contract price allocable to construction work for projects with a contract
 value of greater than or equal to ten million dollars ($10,000,000).

(1) Provide public notice of availability of work to be subcontracted in accordance with the publication requirements applicable to the competitive bidding process of the local agency, including a fixed date and time on which qualifications statements, bids, or proposals will be due.

(2) Establish reasonable qualification criteria and standards.

(3) Award the subcontract on a best value basis. The process may include prequalification or short-listing.

(c) Subcontractors awarded construction subcontracts under this subdivision shall be afforded all the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(d) A construction subcontractor licensed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code that provides design services used on a project authorized by this chapter shall not be subject to any liability arising from their design if the construction subcontract for that design is not performed by that subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.7.

(a) If the local agency elects to award a project pursuant to this chapter, retention proceeds withheld by the local agency from the design-build entity shall not exceed 5 percent if a performance and payment bond, issued by an admitted surety insurer, is required in the solicitation. Work performed to establish the guaranteed maximum price shall not be subject to retention.

(b) In a contract between the design-build entity and a subcontractor, and in a contract between a subcontractor and any subcontractor thereunder, the percentage of the retention proceeds withheld shall not exceed the percentage specified in the contract between the local agency and the design-build entity. If the design-build entity provides written notice to any
 subcontractor that is not a member of the design-build entity, before or at the time the bid is requested, that a bond may be required, and the subcontractor subsequently is unable or refuses to furnish a bond to the design-build entity, then the design-build entity may withhold retention proceeds in excess of the percentage specified in the contract between the local agency and the design-build entity from any payment made by the design-build entity to the subcontractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.8.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, no later than December 31, 2028, a local agency that uses the progressive design-build process pursuant to this chapter shall submit, to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature, a report on the use of the progressive design-build process.

(b) The report shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) A description of the project or projects awarded using the progressive design-build process.

(2) The contract award amounts.

(3) The design-build
 entities awarded the project or projects.

(4) A description of any written protests concerning any aspect of the solicitation, bid, or award of the contracts, including the resolution of the protests.

(5) A description of the prequalification process.

(6) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that provided design services, but did not meet the target price for their scope of work, and therefore did not perform construction services on that project.

(7) Whether or not any portion of a design prepared by the specialty subcontractor that did not perform the construction work for that design was used by the local agency.

(8) The number of
 specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that meet the definition of a small business, as specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(9) The number of specialty subcontractors listed by construction trade type, on each project, that meet the definition of a microbusiness, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code.

(10) If a project awarded under this chapter has been completed, an assessment of the project performance, including, but not limited to, a summary of any delays or cost increases.

(c) The report submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.9.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes a local agency to perform work on a state-owned or state-operated facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.10.

Nothing in this chapter affects, expands, alters, or limits any rights or remedies otherwise available at law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, pursuant to Section 22185.11.)
-------------------------------------------

22185.11.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Ch. 4.7, commencing with Section 22185.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.8. Port of Long Beach Pier Wind Project Contracting [22190. - 22199.]

22190.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Apprenticeable occupation” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 2601.

(b) “Best interests of the city” means a procurement process that is determined by the city to provide the best value and an expedited delivery schedule while maintaining a high level of quality workmanship and materials.

(c) “Best value” means a procurement process whereby the selected bidder may be selected on the basis of objective criteria for evaluating the qualifications of bidders with the
 resulting selection representing the best combination of price and qualifications.

(d) “Business entity” means a partnership, corporation, or other legal entity that is able to provide appropriately licensed contracting, architectural, engineering, financial, construction, operations, management, facilities maintenance, and other services for development of the project, as applicable in relation to its respective scope of work.

(e) “City” means the City of Long Beach and its Board of Harbor Commissioners.

(f) “Construction” for purposes of the project, as defined in subdivision (p), does not include maritime and longshore operations.

(g) “Construction manager at-risk” means a competitively procured contract by the city with an individual, partnership, joint venture, corporation, or other recognized legal entity, that is appropriately licensed in this state, including a contractor’s license issued by the Contractors State License Board, and that guarantees the cost of a project and furnishes construction management services, including, but not limited to, preparation and coordination of bid packages, scheduling, cost control, value engineering, evaluation,
 preconstruction services, and construction administration. 

(h) “Construction Manager/General Contractor” means a project delivery method using a best value procurement process in which a construction manager is procured to provide preconstruction services during the design phase of the project and construction or construction management services during the construction phase of the project.

(i) “Construction subcontract” means each subcontract awarded by a business entity to a subcontractor that will perform work, labor, or render services to the business entity in or about the construction of the project, or a subcontractor licensed by the State of California that, under subcontract to the business entity, specially fabricates and installs a portion of the work or improvement according
 to detailed drawings contained in plans and specifications.

(j) “Design-build” means a procurement process in which both the design and construction of a project are procured in a single phase. 

(k) “Design sequencing” means a method of project delivery that enables the sequencing of design activities to permit each construction phase to commence when the design for that phase is complete, instead of requiring the design for the entire project to be completed before commencing construction.

(l) “Guaranteed maximum price” means the maximum payment agreed upon by the city and a business entity to finish all remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out
 the project or any part of the project.

(m) “Maritime and longshore operations” for purposes of the project, as defined in subdivision (p), includes all of the following:

(1) The loading and unloading of cargo or materials to and from vessels, or the movement of cargo or materials to and from vessels, or other directly related functions, at any terminal or port facility to the cargo’s or material’s point of rest, except for the movement of construction materials on a barge, construction staging area, or construction area when used as a construction work platform, rigging and hoisting of construction materials directly from a barge, construction staging area, or construction area when being
 used as a construction work platform into the construction process, the removal of construction materials directly from the project to a barge, construction staging area, or construction area when being used as a construction work platform, and the movement of construction materials and construction equipment within the construction staging area, from the construction staging area to the construction site, and on the construction site.

(2) Maintenance and repair work on the containers and equipment used to load or unload vessels.

(3) Maintenance and repair work necessary to facilitate the movement of cargo or materials to and from vessels at any terminal or port facility to the cargo or material’s point of rest.

(n) “Preconstruction services” means services during the design phase, including, but not limited to, scheduling, pricing, and phasing to assist the city to design a more constructible project. 

(o) “Progressive design-build” means a project delivery method in which the design, preconstruction services, and construction of the project or part of the project are procured, in one or more stages, from a single design-build entity that is selected
 through a best value-based selection at an early stage of the project. 

(p) (1) “Project” means the terminal development project at the Port of Long Beach, currently known as Pier Wind, that is anticipated to involve the construction and development of a large-scale, multiacre terminal and transportation corridor to support offshore wind-related activities. 

(2) “Project” does not include the construction, assembly,
 operation, or maintenance of offshore wind turbine systems or their floating foundations, nor the manufacturing and fabrication of their components. 

(3) “Project” does not include maritime and longshore operations.

(q) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500.

(r) “Public works” has the same meaning as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 1720 of the Labor Code.

(s) “Vessel” includes, but is not limited to, a ship, boat, barge, and other related maritime craft.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22191.

(a) (1) The city may procure contracts for the project or any part of the project pursuant to this chapter.

(2) The city may enter into an alternative project delivery method contract for any part of the project pursuant to this chapter upon completing both of the following:

(A) An evaluation of the traditional
 design-bid-build process of construction and of the alternative project delivery method in a public meeting.

(B) Following the evaluation specified in subparagraph (A), a written finding that use of the alternative project delivery method on the project will accomplish one or more of the following objectives:

(i) Reduce project costs.

(ii) Expedite the completion of the project.

(iii) Provide features that are not achievable through the design-bid-build method.

(b) Subject to the limitations of this chapter, the city may utilize any of the following alternative project delivery methods, or any combination
 of the following methods:

(1) Construction manager at-risk.

(2) Construction Manager/General Contractor.

(3) Design-build.

(4) Design sequencing.

(5) Progressive design-build.

(c) The design and construction of the project may occur in sequential or concurrent phases.

(d) This chapter does not allow an alternative project delivery method to include maritime and longshore operations.

(e) Except to the extent otherwise required under applicable law, the city may include in any contract procured pursuant to this chapter any provision that the city determines is necessary or appropriate.

(f) (1) The city shall prepare, publicly advertise, and issue solicitation documents to procure and award any contract pursuant to this chapter, subject to the following:

(A) For Construction Manager/General Contractor contracts, the solicitation documents prepared by the city shall include criteria that are the same as, or substantially similar to, those provided in subparagraphs (A) to (K), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of, and paragraph (2) of, subdivision (a) of Section 6703.

(B) For design-build and progressive design-build contracts, the city shall comply with the same or substantially similar requirements of Section 22185.2 and Sections 22185.4 to 22185.7, inclusive, and subdivisions (a), (c), and (d) of Section 22185.3.

(2) The contract solicitation process may include prequalification or short-listing business entities who seek to perform the project or any part of the project.

(3) The city shall review submissions it solicits and receives and may award contracts for the project to one or more responsible business entities whose submissions are determined by the city to be the most advantageous by providing the best value in meeting the best interests of the city.

(g) The city shall retain the right not to award any contract
 for the project, including if the city determines that the project is not in the best interests of the city or should negotiations with any business entity otherwise fail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22192.

(a) (1) Upon agreement of the pricing, including any guaranteed maximum price if applicable, for any relevant aspects of the project, the city, in its sole and absolute discretion, may do all of the following:

(A) Amend its contract with the business entity.

(B) Direct the business entity to complete the remaining design, preconstruction, and construction activities sufficient to complete and close out the project or any part of the project.

(C) Add funds to the contract for the activities pursuant to this
 subdivision.

(2) Any amendment of the existing contract with the business entity shall not require any additional competitive process. 

(3) This section does not require the city to amend an existing contract or enter into a new contract for remaining design, preconstruction, or construction activities for the project.

(b) (1) If the city and the business entity do not reach an agreement on pricing for any relevant aspect of the project, or if the city otherwise elects not to have the business entity
 complete some or all of the remaining work, the city may solicit proposals to complete some or all of the remaining work for the project from firms that previously submitted proposals.

(2) (A) The city may, upon written determination that it is in the best interest of the city to do so, formally solicit proposals from other business entities to complete some or all of the remaining work for the project, or complete the project using other delivery methods.

(B) If otherwise applicable to the city, any contract awarded
 for the project shall be made on a best value basis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22193.

(a) The city, in its solicitation for proposals or bids for the project, may identify specific types of subcontractors, certifications, and license classifications that shall be included in the business entity’s proposal or bid.

(b) All construction subcontractors that are identified in the business entity’s proposal or bid shall be afforded the protections of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 4100) of Part 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   (AB 2235)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22194.
